Illinois, session 104th, HB3616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act 5is amended by changing Sections 5 and 20 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 67/5)7    Sec. 5. Findings. The legislature finds and declares that: 8        (1) there exists a shortage of affordable, accessible, 9    safe, and sanitary housing in the State; 10        (2) it is imperative that action be taken to assure 11    the availability of workforce and retirement housing; and 12        (3) local governments in the State that do not have 13    sufficient affordable housing are encouraged to assist in 14    providing affordable housing opportunities to assure the 15    health, safety, and welfare of all citizens of the State; 16    .17        (4) increasing the inventory and affordability of 18    housing choices for people earning between 80% and 140% of 19    the area median income, termed the missing middle, also 20    helps preserve affordable housing, prevents homelessness, 21    and encourages investment in more inclusive, mixed-income 22    communities throughout the State; and 23        (5) studying the inventory and affordability gaps that   HB3616 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11342 KTG 21430 b1    affect the missing middle is also crucial to ensuring 2    workforce and retirement housing in the State. 3(Source: P.A. 93-595, eff. 1-1-04.) 4    (310 ILCS 67/20)5    Sec. 20. Determination of exempt local governments. 6    (a) Beginning October 1, 2004, the Illinois Housing 7Development Authority shall determine which local governments 8are exempt and not exempt from the operation of this Act based 9on an identification of the total number of year-round housing 10units in the most recent data from the U.S. Census Bureau for 11each local government within the State and by an inventory of 12owner-occupied and rental affordable housing units, as defined 13in this Act, for each local government from the U.S. Census 14Bureau and other relevant sources.15    (b) The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall make 16this determination by: 17        (i) totaling the number of owner-occupied housing 18    units in each local government that are affordable to 19    households with a gross household income that is less than 20    80% of the median household income within the county or 21    primary metropolitan statistical area; 22        (ii) totaling the number of rental units in each local 23    government that are affordable to households with a gross 24    household income that is less than 60% of the median 25    household income within the county or primary metropolitan   HB3616 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11342 KTG 21430 b1    statistical area; 2        (iii) adding the number of owner-occupied and rental 3    units for each local government from items (i) and (ii); 4    and 5        (iv) dividing the sum of (iii) above by the total 6    number of year-round housing units in the local government 7    as contained in the latest U.S. Census Bureau and 8    multiplying the result by 100 to determine the percentage 9    of affordable housing units within the jurisdiction of the 10    local government.11    (c) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 98th General Assembly, the Illinois Housing Development 13Authority shall publish a list of exempt and non-exempt local 14governments and the data that it used to calculate its 15determination at least once every 5 years. The data shall be 16shown for each local government in the State and for the State 17as a whole. Upon publishing a list of exempt and non-exempt 18local governments, the Illinois Housing Development Authority 19shall notify a local government that it is not exempt from the 20operation of this Act and provide to it the data used to 21calculate its determination.22    (d) A local government or developer of affordable housing 23may appeal the determination of the Illinois Housing 24Development Authority as to whether the local government is 25exempt or non-exempt under this Act in connection with an 26appeal under Section 30 of this Act.  HB3616 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 11342 KTG 21430 b1    (e) Additionally, the Illinois Housing Development 2Authority shall make the following calculations:3        (i) totaling the number of owner-occupied housing 4    units in each local government that are affordable to 5    households with a gross household income that is at or 6    below 30% of the median household income within the county 7    or primary metropolitan statistical area;8        (ii) totaling the number of rental units in each local 9    government that are affordable to households with a gross 10    household income that is at or below 30% of the median 11    household income within the county or primary metropolitan 12    statistical area;13        (iii) adding the number of owner-occupied and rental 14    units for each local government from items (i) and (ii);15        (iv) dividing the sum of (iii) above by the total 16    number of year-round housing units in the local government 17    as contained in the latest U.S. Census Bureau and 18    multiplying the result by 100 to determine the percentage 19    of extremely low-income affordable housing units within 20    the jurisdiction of the local government;21        (v) totaling the number of owner-occupied housing 22    units in each local government that are affordable to 23    households with a gross household income that is between 24    80% and 140% of the median household income within the 25    county or primary metropolitan statistical area;26        (vi) totaling the number of rental units in each local   HB3616 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 11342 KTG 21430 b1    government that are affordable to households with a gross 2    household income that is between 60% and 80% of the median 3    household income within the county or primary metropolitan 4    statistical area;5        (vii) totaling the number of rental units in each 6    local government that are affordable to households with a 7    gross household income that is between 80% and 140% of the 8    median household income within the county or primary 9    metropolitan statistical area;10        (viii) adding the number of owner-occupied and rental 11    units for each local government from items (v), (vi), and 12    (vii); and13        (ix) dividing the sum of (viii) above by the total 14    number of year-round housing units in the local government 15    as contained in the latest U.S. Census Bureau and 16    multiplying the result by 100 to determine the percentage 17    of affordable middle housing units within the jurisdiction 18    of the local government.19    (f) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act 20of the 104th General Assembly, the Illinois Housing 21Development Authority shall publish the data collected under 22paragraphs (i) through (ix) of subsection (e). The data shall 23be shown for each local government in the State and for the 24State as a whole and shall be published at least once every 5 25years. The Illinois Housing Development Authority shall also 26compile the collected data into a report and submit the report   HB3616 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 11342 KTG 21430 b1to the General Assembly. 2    (g) The data collected under subsection (e) shall be for 3informational purposes only and shall not factor into the 4determination of exempt local governments. 5(Source: P.A. 98-287, eff. 8-9-13.)